Washington statutes.
RCW 18.25.0181

Commission—Information to legislature.

In addition to the authority provided in RCW 42.52.804, the commission, its members, or staff as directed by the commission, may communicate, present information requested, volunteer information, testify before legislative committees, and educate the legislature, as the commission may from time to time see fit.

[ 2013 c 81 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2013 c 81: See note following RCW 18.25.0167.